Utah statutes.
9-8-207.   Historical Society -- Donations -- Accounting.
(1) (a)  There is created the Utah State Historical Society.
(b)  The society may:
(i)  solicit memberships from persons interested in the work of the society
and charge dues for memberships commensurate with the advantages of membership
and the needs of the society; and
(ii)  receive gifts, donations, bequests, devises, and endowments of money or
property, which shall then become the property of the state of Utah.
(2)  If the donor directs that money or property donated under Subsection
(1)(b)(ii) be used in a specified manner, then the division shall use it in
accordance with these directions.  Otherwise, all donated money and the
proceeds from donated property, together with the charges realized from
society memberships, shall be deposited in the General Fund as restricted
revenue of the society.
(3)  The division shall keep a correct account of funds and property received,
held, or disbursed by the society, and shall make reports to the governor as
in the case of other state institutions.
